Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Licensing.

Sec. 06.40.010.
License required.

Except as provided in AS

06.40.020

, a person may not engage in the business of entering into premium finance agreements on insurance sold in this state or risks located in this state, either directly or indirectly, or otherwise act as a premium finance company in this state without being licensed by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

For operations, see 3 AAC 7, art. 2.

For premium financing, see 3 AAC 23, art. 2.

Sec. 06.40.020.
Applicability.

This chapter does not apply to

an insurer authorized to transact business in this state with respect to premiums on policies that the insurer issues;

a bank, trust company, savings association, or other financial institution subject to the other chapters of this title and authorized to transact business in this state that does not possess or acquire any right, title, or interest with respect to the insurance policy for which the premiums are financed other than in the proceeds of it in the event of loss;

the inclusion of a charge for insurance in connection with an installment sale under AS 45.10; and

persons licensed under AS 21.27 financing only their own accounts if they are in compliance with AS

21.36.490

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in paragraph (4), “AS

21.36.490

” was substituted for “AS

21.36.122

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.36.122

.

Administrative Code. —

For premium financing, see 3 AAC 23, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 170, SLA 1978 provides that the provisions of that Act, which enacted this chapter, do not void a lawful contract entered into before October 15, 1978.

Sec. 06.40.030.
Bond.

The applicant shall file with the application a bond to be approved by the department in which the applicant is the obligor, in the sum of $5,000 with one or more sureties. The bond shall be for the use of the state and any person who may have a cause of action against the obligor under this chapter. The bond must state that the obligor will faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of this chapter and of all regulations lawfully adopted by the department, and will pay to the state and to any person all money that may become due or owing to the state or to the person from the applicant under this chapter. The aggregate liability of the surety for all breaches of the bond condition may not exceed the penal sum of the bond, and the bond may be cancelled by the surety on 30 days notice to the commissioner.

If at any time the commissioner finds that the bond is unsatisfactory for any reason, the commissioner may require the licensee to file, within 10 days after the receipt of a written demand for it, an additional bond complying with the provisions of (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 06.40.040.
Annual license fee.

On or before December 20 of each year, each licensee shall pay a fee of $200 to the department as an annual license fee for the next succeeding calendar year. At that same time the licensee shall file with the department a new bond that complies with AS

06.40.030

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 06.40.050.
Application for license; fee; disclosure for child support purposes; interrogatories; refusal to issue or continue license.

Application for a license under this chapter shall be in writing and in the form prescribed by the department. If the applicant is a natural person, the application form must require submission of the applicant’s social security number.

All reasonable investigation expenses incurred by the department in processing an application for approval of a proposed premium finance company shall be charged to and paid by the applicant in accordance with AS

06.01.010

. At the time of submitting the application to the department, the applicant shall pay to the department $500 in partial payment of the investigation expenses incurred by the department. If the investigation expenses incurred by the department do not exceed $500, the remainder shall be promptly refunded to the applicant.

The person to whom the license may be or is issued shall file sworn answers to interrogatories required by the commissioner. The commissioner shall have authority, at any time, to require the licensee fully to disclose the identity of all directors, partners, officers, and managerial employees. The commissioner may refuse to issue or continue a license in the name of any firm or corporation if the commissioner determines that any officer, employee, stockholder, or partner of the firm or corporation who may materially influence the licensee’s conduct does not meet the requirements of this chapter.

All premium finance licenses shall continue in force until suspended or revoked, subject to the payment by the licensee of the annual license fee and to the licensee being in compliance with other provisions of this chapter.

Upon request, the department shall provide a social security number submitted under (a) of this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978; am §§ 4, 5 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (e) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 06.40.060.
Place of business.

A licensee may maintain only one place of business under a license. The department may issue more than one license to the same licensee upon application and compliance by the licensee with the provisions of this chapter governing the original issuance of a license.

If a licensee changes the place of business to another location, the licensee shall give written notice to the department. The department shall attach the written notice of the change to the license together with the date. Thereafter, the licensee may operate the business under the license at the new location.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 06.40.070.
Investigation; qualifications for license.

Upon the filing of an application and payment of the investigation fee specified in AS

06.40.050(b)

, the commissioner shall conduct an investigation of an applicant and shall issue a premium finance company license if the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter. If the commissioner does not so find, the commissioner shall, within 30 days after receipt of the application, at the request of the applicant, give the applicant a full hearing.

The commissioner shall issue a license to an applicant when the commissioner is satisfied that the applicant

is competent and trustworthy and intends to act in good faith in the capacity involved by the license applied for;

has a good business reputation and has had experience, training, or education so as to be qualified in the business for which the license is applied; and

if a corporation, is a corporation incorporated under the laws of this state or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 06.40.080.
Revocation or suspension of license.

The commissioner may revoke or suspend the license of any licensee when, upon completion of an investigation, the commissioner determines that

the license issued to the company was obtained by fraud;

there was misrepresentation in the application for the license;

the holder of the license has otherwise proven to be untrustworthy or incompetent to act as a premium finance company; or

the licensee has violated any of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.